Washington statutes.
RCW 4.36.080

Conditions precedent, how pleaded.

In pleading the performance of conditions precedent in a contract, it shall not be necessary to state the facts showing such performance, but it may be stated generally that the party duly performed all the conditions on his or her part; and if such allegation be controverted, the party pleading shall be bound to establish, on the trial, the facts showing such performance.

[ 2011 c 336 s 105; Code 1881 s 97; 1877 p 21 s 97; 1854 p 142 s 59; RRS s 288.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 9(c).